Utah statutes.
70A-9a-628.   Nonliability and limitation on liability of secured party -- Liability of secondary obligor.

(1)  Unless a secured party knows that a person is a debtor or obligor, knows the identity of the person, and knows how to communicate with the person:

(a)  the secured party is not liable to the person, or to a secured party or lienholder that has filed a financing statement against the person, for failure to comply with this chapter; and

(b)  the secured party's failure to comply with this chapter does not affect the liability of the person for a deficiency.

(2)  A secured party is not liable because of its status as secured party:

(a)  to a person that is a debtor or obligor, unless the secured party knows:

(i)  that the person is a debtor or obligor;

(ii)  the identity of the person; and

(iii)  how to communicate with the person; or

(b)  to a secured party or lienholder that has filed a financing statement against a person, unless the secured party knows:

(i)  that the person is a debtor; and

(ii)  the identity of the person.

(3)  A secured party is not liable to any person, and a person's liability for a deficiency is not affected, because of any act or omission arising out of the secured party's reasonable belief that a transaction is not a consumer-goods transaction or a consumer transaction or that goods are not consumer goods, if the secured party's belief is based on its reasonable reliance on:

(a)  a debtor's representation concerning the purpose for which collateral was to be used, acquired, or held; or

(b)  an obligor's representation concerning the purpose for which a secured obligation was incurred.

(4)  A secured party is not liable to any person under Subsection 70A-9a-625(3)(b) for its failure to comply with Section 70A-9a-616.

(5)  A secured party is not liable under Section 70A-9a-625(3)(b) more than once with respect to any one secured obligation.

